Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle D. Liability of the Registrar, Penalties and Injunctive Relief.

§ 23-15-91.
No personal liability for error of judgment.

The county registrar, while acting within his jurisdiction and under the authority of this chapter, shall not be liable personally for any error of judgment regarding the registration of electors.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-27 [Codes, 1942, § 3210.5; Laws, 1955, Ex ch. 102, § 6; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 26, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-93.
Penalties.

If any election commissioner or registrar shall refuse or neglect to perform any of the duties imposed upon him or her by this chapter regarding the registration of electors, or shall knowingly permit any person to sign a false affidavit or otherwise knowingly permit any person to violate any provision of this chapter regarding the registration of electors, or shall violate any of the provisions of this chapter regarding the registration of electors, or if any officer taking the affidavits as provided in this chapter regarding registration of electors shall make any false statement in his or her certificate thereto attached, he or she shall be deemed guilty of a crime and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the penitentiary not exceeding one (1) year, and shall be removed from office.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-311 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-601; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 601; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 337]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 27; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 173, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-95.
Injunctive relief.

In addition to the penalties set forth in Section 23-15-93, any applicant aggrieved by any registrar or election commissioner because of their refusal or neglect to perform any of the duties prescribed by this chapter regarding the registration of electors may petition the chancery court of the county of the registrar or election commissioner for an injunction or mandate to enforce the performance of such duties and to secure to that applicant the rights to which he or she may be entitled under the provisions of the sections.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-312 [Laws, 1975, ch. 502, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 337]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 28; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2017.